Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

General Provisions

4-3-101. Administrative departments and divisions — Creation.

There are created and established the following administrative departments of state government:

Department of agriculture;

Department of audit;

Department of children's services;

Department of commerce and insurance;

Department of correction;

Department of economic and community development;

Department of education;

Department of environment and conservation;

Department of finance and administration;

Department of financial institutions;

Department of general services;

Department of health;

Department of human resources;

Department of human services;

Department of intellectual and developmental disabilities;

Department of labor and workforce development;

Department of mental health and substance abuse services;

Department of revenue;

Department of safety;

Department of state;

Department of tourist development;

Department of transportation;

Department of the treasury;

Department of veterans services; and

Legal department.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 24; Shan. Supp., §§ 373a30, 373a62; Acts 1929, ch. 22, § 1; Code 1932, §§ 255, 286, 9950; Acts 1933, ch. 92, § 1(12); 1937, ch. 33, §§ 1, 5, 15, 31; 1939, ch. 11, §§ 1, 10, 16; 1945, ch. 28, § 1; 1945, ch. 34, § 1; 1945, ch. 40, § 1; 1947, ch. 29, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 255.1, 255.5, 255.15; Acts 1953, ch. 27, § 1; 1953, ch. 163, § 1; 1955, ch. 102, § 1; 1959, ch. 9, §§ 2, 3, 5-7, 9, 11, 14; 1961, ch. 97, §§ 1, 5; 1963, ch. 169, §§ 1, 3; 1971, ch. 137, § 1; 1972, ch. 543, §§ 3, 7, 10; 1972, ch. 829, § 18; 1972, ch. 852, §§ 4, 15; 1973, ch. 294, § 2; 1975, ch. 219, § 1(a); 1975, ch. 248, § 1(a); 1975, ch. 249, § 1(a); 1976, ch. 468, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-301; Acts 1983, ch. 216, § 1; 1983, ch. 311, § 1; 1983, ch. 472, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 16; 1991, ch. 289, § 1; 1991, ch. 448, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 17; 1999, ch. 520, §§ 15, 16; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2007, ch. 60, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 3, 4; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2015, ch. 24, §§ 3, 7.

Compiler's Notes. The department of agriculture, created by this section and §4-3-201, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

The department of children's services, created by this section and §37-5-101, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

The department of commerce and insurance, created by this section and §4-3-1301, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

The department of correction, created by this section and §4-3-601, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

The department of economic and community development, created by this section and §4-3-701, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

The department of education, created by §4-3-801 and this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

The department of environment and conservation, created by this section and §4-3-501, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

The department of finance and administration, created by this section and §4-3-1001, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

The department of financial institutions, created by this section and §4-3-401, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

The department of general services, created by this section and §4-3-1101, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

The department of health, created by this section and §4-3-1801, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

The department of human resources, created by this section and §4-3-1701, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

The department of human services, created by this section and §4-3-1201, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

The department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, created by this section and §4-3-2701, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

The department of labor and workforce development, created by this section and §4-3-1403, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services, created by this section and §4-3-1601, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

The department of revenue, created by this section and §4-3-1901, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

The department of safety, created by this section and §4-3-2001, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

Acts 2014, ch. 773, § 3 provided that the division of state audit shall return to the department of safety in 2016 for the purpose of conducting a limited audit to review actions taken by the department to address the issues raised in the findings of the October 2013 performance audit report. The division of state audit shall complete the limited audit within a period sufficient to allow for its review by the government operations joint subcommittee on judiciary and government no later than December 1, 2016.

The department of tourist development, created by this section and §4-3-2201, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

The department of transportation, created by this section and §4-3-2301, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

The department of veterans services, created by this section and §4-3-2501, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3 provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

For transfer of certain TennCare-related functions from the department of finance and administration to the department of health. See Executive Orders Nos. 1 (January 26, 1995) and 11 (January 7, 1997).

For transfer of the TennCare program and its related functions and administrative support from the department of health to the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 23 (October 19, 1999).

For an Order establishing the Tennessee Title VI Compliance Commission, see Executive Order No. 34 (August 9, 2002).

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2011, ch. 476, § 3 provided that the division of state audit in the office of the comptroller of the treasury shall provide its findings to the house of representatives and senate government operations committees by July 1, 2013, on the department of education’s responses to the findings and recommendations in the January, 2011, performance audit of the department of education.

Acts 2015, ch. 18, § 3 provided that the Department of Health shall appear before the Government Operations Joint Evaluation Committee on Education, Health and General Welfare no later than December 31, 2015, to update the Committee on the Department’s progress in addressing the findings set forth in the November 2014 performance audit report.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Acts 2015, ch. 63, § 3 provided that the department of correction shall appear before the government operations joint evaluation committee on judiciary and government no later than October 1, 2015, to update the committee on the department’s progress in addressing the findings set forth in the September 2014 performance audit report.

Acts 2015, ch. 129, § 3 provides that the Department of Education shall appear before the Government Operations Joint Evaluation Committee on Education, Health and General Welfare no later than December 1, 2015, to update the Committee on the Department’s progress in addressing the findings set forth in the November 2014 performance audit report.

Acts 2019, ch. 336, § 3 provides that the department of education shall appear before the government operations joint evaluation committee on education, health and general welfare no later than March 15, 2019, to update the committee on the department's progress in addressing the findings set forth in the December 2018 performance audit report.

Cross-References. Annual departmental reports prepared by administrative department head, §4-4-114.

Department of agriculture created, §4-3-201.

Department of audit created, §4-3-301.

Department of children's services created, §37-5-101.

Department of commerce and insurance created, §4-3-1301.

Department of correction created, §4-3-601.

Department of economic and community development created, §4-3-701.

Department of education created, §4-3-801.

Department of environment and conservation created, §4-3-501.

Department of finance and administration created, §4-3-1001.

Department of financial institutions created, §4-3-401.

Department of general services created, §4-3-1101.

Department of health created, §4-3-1801.

Department of human resources created, §4-3-1701.

Department of human services created, §4-3-1201.

Department of intellectual and developmental disabilities created, §4-3-2701 et seq.

Department of labor and workforce development created, §4-3-1403.

Department of mental health and substance abuse services, §4-3-1601.

Department of revenue created, §4-3-1901.

Department of safety created, §4-3-2001.

Department of state created, §4-3-2101.

Department of the treasury created, §4-3-2401.

Department of tourist development created, §4-3-2201.

Department of transportation created, §4-3-2301.

Department of veterans services created, §4-3-2501.

Legal department created, §4-3-1501.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Boundaries, § 1; 22 Tenn. Juris., State, § 5.

Law Reviews.

The Independent Agency After Bowsher v. Synar — Alive and Kicking, 40 Vand. L. Rev. 903 (1987).

4-3-102. Control of state buildings.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the legislative branch of state government and the judicial branch of state government maintain control of the state buildings occupied predominantly by the legislative branch and the judicial branch, respectively.

Acts 2016, ch. 1031, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-102 (Acts 1965, ch. 244, §§ 1, 2; 1970, ch. 477, §§ 1-3), concerning the staff division for urban and federal affairs, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 572, § 1, effective July 1, 1980.

4-3-103. Powers and duties of departments.

These departments shall be vested respectively with such powers and required to perform such duties as are set forth in this chapter and shall be charged with the administration, execution and performance of such laws as the general assembly may enact from time to time.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 373a31; Code 1932, § 25; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 1; 1939, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-301.

4-3-104. Name changes of departments and divisions.

References appearing elsewhere in this code to the department of accounts, the department of the budget or to the office of the state property administrator are deemed references to the department of finance and administration.

References to the department of finance and taxation are deemed references to the department of revenue.

References to the department of highways and public works when relating to public buildings are deemed references to the department of general services.

References to the department of highways and public works, except when relating to public buildings, and references to the bureau of aeronautics, the bureau of highways and the mass transit bureau are deemed references to the department of transportation.

References to the department of institutions are deemed references to the department of correction.

References to the department of insurance and banking are deemed references to the department of commerce and insurance.

References to the department of local finance or division of local finance are deemed references to the office of the comptroller of the treasury.

References to the department of public welfare are deemed references to the department of human services.

References to the department of standards and purchases are deemed references to the department of general services.

References to the staff division of industrial development are deemed references to the industrial development division of the department of economic and community development.

References to the division of hotel and restaurant inspection of the department of conservation are deemed references to the hotel and restaurant division of the department of tourist development.

References to the staff division of veterans' affairs and references to the department of veterans' affairs are deemed references to the department of veterans services.

References to the state educational agency for surplus property are deemed references to the department of general services.

References to the tourism development division of the department of economic and community development are deemed references to the tourism division of the department of tourist development.

References to the department of banking are deemed references to the department of financial institutions.

References in title 45, chapter 5, except in § 45-5-304(a)(4), to the department of commerce and insurance are deemed to be references to the department of financial institutions.

References to the department of insurance are deemed references to the department of commerce and insurance.

References to the department of public health are deemed references to the department of health.

References to the department of health and environment are deemed references to the department of health.

References to the department of conservation are deemed references to the department of environment and conservation.

References to the department of labor are deemed references to the department of labor and workforce development.

References to the department of employment security are deemed references to the department of labor and workforce development.

References to the department of personnel are deemed references to the department of human resources.

References to the board of probation and parole are deemed references to the board of parole.

References to the elevator division, division of mines, labor standards division, and division of boiler and elevator inspection, are deemed references to the department of labor and workforce development.

Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; 1959, ch. 9, §§ 3, 8, 14; 1961, ch. 97, § 3; 1971, ch. 137, § 1; 1972, ch. 543, §§ 5, 7, 9, 12; 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1972, ch. 852, § 12; 1975, ch. 219, § 1(b); 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1(b), 1(f); 1975, ch. 249, §§ 1(b), 3; 1976, ch. 468, § 2; T.C.A. § 4-301; Acts 1981, ch. 264, §§ 12, 17, 19, 22; 1983, ch. 216, § 2; 1983, ch. 274, § 22; 1983, ch. 311, § 2; 1983, ch. 442, § 4; 1983, ch. 472, § 2; 1991, ch. 289, § 2; 1991, ch. 448, § 2; 1999, ch. 520, § 17; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2007, ch. 60, § 2; 2010, ch. 868, § 2; 2010, ch. 1100 § 5; 2012, ch. 727, § 1; 2015, ch. 24, §§ 5, 7; 2016, ch. 599, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the preamble to the act concerning transfers of certain functions relating to probation and parole services and the community correction grant program from the board of probation and parole to the department of correction, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 727.

Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 63 provided that the implementation of the act, which added subsection (z) (now (x)), shall be fully accomplished on or before January 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

4-3-105. Criminal history investigations of employees and contractors with access to federal tax information.

The administrative departments of state government are authorized, as necessary to comply with internal revenue service Publication 1075, including amendments thereto and publications replacing Publication 1075, to obtain state and national criminal history background checks and investigations performed by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation on all employees and contractors with access to federal tax information.

An employee or contractor of any administrative department of state government with access to or that uses federal tax information must:

Agree to a local background check and the release of all investigative records to the state government for the purpose of verifying criminal history information; and

Supply a fingerprint sample and submit to a state criminal history background check and investigation to be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation, and then submit to a national criminal history background check to be conducted by the federal bureau of investigation.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (c), a state administrative department shall pay any costs incurred to conduct background checks and investigations requested by the department. The state administrative department may require a person or entity contracting with the department to pay the costs associated with the background investigations for all employees of the contractor. The requirement may be a condition of the contract with the department. Payment must be made in accordance with § 38-6-103.

Each state administrative department required to conduct background checks and investigations pursuant to this section shall establish written policies concerning the implementation and use of the background checks and investigations conducted pursuant to this section.

Acts 2017, ch. 343, § 1.

4-3-106. Notice of outsourcing of facilities management services — Facilities management status report.

Not less than thirty (30) days before a department or agency of state government executes a state professional facilities management contract for services within a state legislative district that would result in the outsourcing of facilities management services to private, nonstate government entities, the respective department or agency shall notify each member of the general assembly representing such district of the contract.

In addition, on an annual basis, the department of general services shall provide a facilities management status report to the governor, speaker of the senate, and speaker of the house of representatives. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

The departments or agencies executing a state contract for professional facilities management;

The number of state employees impacted by such contract;

The estimated cost savings of such contract; and

The cost savings realized by any such contract in place for one (1) year or greater.

Acts 2017, ch. 469, § 6.

4-3-107 — 4-3-110. [Reserved.]

There shall be a chief executive officer of each of the administrative departments of state government created by §4-3-101, which shall be as follows:

Attorney general and reporter, for the legal department;

Commissioner of agriculture, for the department of agriculture;

Commissioner of children's services, for the department of children's services;

Commissioner of commerce and insurance, for the department of commerce and insurance;

Commissioner of correction, for the department of correction;

Commissioner of economic and community development, for the department of economic and community development;

Commissioner of education, for the department of education;

Commissioner of environment and conservation, for the department of environment and conservation;

Commissioner of finance and administration, for the department of finance and administration;

Commissioner of financial institutions, for the department of financial institutions;

Commissioner of general services, for the department of general services;

Commissioner of health, for the department of health;

Commissioner of human resources, for the department of human resources;

Commissioner of human services, for the department of human services;

Commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, for the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities;

Commissioner of labor and workforce development, for the department of labor and workforce development;

Commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services, for the department of mental health and substance abuse services;

Commissioner of revenue, for the department of revenue;

Commissioner of safety, for the department of safety;

Commissioner of tourist development, for the department of tourist development;

Commissioner of transportation, for the department of transportation;

Commissioner of veterans services, for the department of veterans services;

Comptroller of the treasury, for the department of audit;

Secretary of state, for the department of state; and

State treasurer, for the department of treasury.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 2, 24; 1925, ch. 115, § 4; Shan. Supp., §§ 373a32, 373a62, 1487a19; Acts 1929, ch. 22, § 1; Code 1932, §§ 257, 286, 2310, 9950; Acts 1933, ch. 92, § 1(12); 1937, ch. 33, §§ 2, 15; 1939, ch. 11, §§ 2, 10; 1945, ch. 6, § 1; 1945, ch. 28, §§ 2, 3; 1945, ch. 34, § 2; 1945, ch. 40, § 4; 1947, ch. 29, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 255.2, 255.15; Acts 1953, ch. 27, § 2; 1953, ch. 163, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; Acts 1959, ch. 9, §§ 2, 3, 5-7, 9, 11, 14; 1961, ch. 97, §§ 2, 5; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; Acts 1971, ch. 137, § 2; 1972, ch. 543, §§ 4, 7, 11; 1972, ch. 829, § 19; 1972, ch. 852, §§ 6, 16; 1973, ch. 294, § 3; 1975, ch. 219, § 2(a); 1975, ch. 248, § 1(c); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 249, § 1(a); Acts 1976, ch. 468, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-302; Acts 1983, ch. 216, § 3; 1983, ch. 311, § 3; 1983, ch. 472, § 3; 1989, ch. 278, § 17; 1991, ch. 289, § 3; 1991, ch. 448, § 3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 18; 1999, ch. 520, § 18; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2007, ch. 60, § 3; 2010, ch. 1100, § 6; 2012, ch. 575, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 24, §§ 4, 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

4-3-112. Appointment of commissioners.

The commissioners shall be appointed by the governor for terms to expire with the beginning of the term of the governor next elected, or whenever their successors shall be appointed and qualified.

Each commissioner shall hold office at the pleasure of the governor.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 373a33; Acts 1933, ch. 92, § 1(1); 1935, ch. 169, § 1; Code 1932, § 258; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 2; 1939, ch. 11, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-302.

4-3-113. Name changes of departments, directors and commissioners.

References appearing elsewhere in this code to the director of accounts, the director of the budget or to the state property administrator are deemed references to the commissioner of finance and administration.

References to the superintendent of banks, to the superintendent of banking or to the commissioner of banking are deemed references to the commissioner of financial institutions.

References to the commissioner of finance and taxation are deemed references to the commissioner of revenue.

References to the commissioner of highways and public works, when relating to public buildings, are deemed references to the commissioner of general services.

References to the commissioner of highways and public works, except when relating to public buildings, and references to the director of the bureau of aeronautics, the director of the bureau of highways, and the director of the mass transit bureau are deemed references to the commissioner of transportation.

References to the commissioner of institutions are deemed references to the commissioner of correction.

References to the commissioner of insurance and banking are deemed references to the commissioner of commerce and insurance.

References to the state director of local finance, director of local finance, state director of the division of local finance or to the director of the division of local finance are deemed references to the comptroller of the treasury.

References to the commissioner of public welfare are deemed references to the commissioner of human services.

References to the commissioner of standards and purchases are deemed references to the commissioner of general services.

References to the director of the staff division of industrial development are deemed references to the director of the industrial development division of the department of economic and community development.

References to the director of the division of hotel and restaurant inspection of the department of conservation are deemed references to the commissioner of tourist development.

References to the director of veterans' affairs and references to the commissioner of veterans' affairs are deemed references to the commissioner of veterans services.

References to the assistant commissioner of the tourism development division in the department of economic and community development are deemed references to the commissioner of tourist development.

References to the commissioner of insurance are deemed references to the commissioner of commerce and insurance.

References to the commissioner of public health are deemed references to the commissioner of health.

References to the commissioner of health and environment are deemed references to the commissioner of health.

References to the commissioner of conservation are deemed references to the commissioner of environment and conservation.

References to the department of employment security are deemed references to the department of labor and workforce development.

References to the department of labor are deemed references to the department of labor and workforce development.

References to the commissioner of personnel are deemed references to the commissioner of human resources.

Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; 1959, ch. 9, §§ 3, 8, 14; 1961, ch. 97, § 3; 1971, ch. 137, § 2; 1972, ch. 543, §§ 5, 7, 12; 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1972, ch. 852, § 12; 1973, ch. 294, § 5; 1975, ch. 219, § 2(b); 1975, ch. 248, § 1(f); 1975, ch. 249, §§ 2, 3; 1976, ch. 468, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 4-302, 4-332; Acts 1981, ch. 264, §§ 12, 17, 22; 1983, ch. 216, § 4; 1983, ch. 274, § 23; 1983, ch. 311, § 4; 1983, ch. 442, § 5; 1983, ch. 472, § 4; 1991, ch. 289, § 4; 1991, ch. 448, § 4; 1999, ch. 520, § 25; 2007, ch. 60, § 4; 2010, ch. 868, § 3; 2010, ch. 1100, § 7; 2015, ch. 24, §§ 6, 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

4-3-114 — 4-3-120. [Reserved.]

The commissioners of the administrative departments of the state government created by this chapter shall be the administrative heads of those departments. They shall have charge and general supervision of their respective departments.

The officers and employees of the various departments established by this chapter shall be under the supervision, direction and control of the commissioners of their respective departments and shall perform such duties as the commissioners may prescribe.

Each staff division of the governor's office shall have as its chief executive officer a staff director who shall be appointed by the governor for a term to expire with the beginning of the term of the governor next elected, or whenever the staff director's successor shall be appointed and qualified, and who shall hold office at the pleasure of the governor.

Staff directors shall have charge and general supervision of their respective divisions and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties in regard thereto as are vested therein by law, and shall receive compensation in the amount provided by § 8-23-101 for commissioners of departments.

Staff directors, with respect to their divisions, shall be subject to all laws applying generally to commissioners of administrative departments, and staff divisions shall be subject to all laws applying generally to state administrative departments.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 373a34, 373a35; Code 1932, §§ 259, 260; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 255.3; Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 2; 1963, ch. 169, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-303.

4-3-122. Governor's cabinet.

The commissioners of the administrative departments shall constitute a cabinet or advisory staff to the governor on all matters of state administration.

Staff directors may be members of the governor's cabinet or advisory staff, and the secretary of state, the state treasurer and the comptroller of the treasury may also serve on the governor's cabinet or advisory staff if invited to do so by the governor.

The governor shall hold regular meetings of this cabinet each month, or more often at the governor's option.

At these meetings, the administrative work and budgetary requirements of each department shall be discussed, and practical methods devised and applied to further cooperation in, and coordination of, such work, and to eliminate duplication and overlapping of functions between the several departments.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 4; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 255.4; Acts 1959, ch. 9, §§ 2, 10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-304.

4-3-123. Commission on aging and disability — Review of agency proposals.

In order to fulfill its duties as established by § 71-2-105, it is essential that the commission on aging and disability have an opportunity to review and comment on proposed plans, programs and rules that may have a substantial and direct effect on persons sixty (60) years of age or older and to be given the opportunity to have its representative in attendance at meetings of administrative departments or agencies of state government that qualify as open meetings as defined in § 8-44-102, at which such matters are intended to be considered. Therefore, the commission through its executive director shall define those areas of concern that affect older Tennesseans and make such areas known to state departments and agencies.

State departments and agencies of state government shall appropriately notify the commission in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, and the procedure for intergovernmental review established by Executive Order No. 58, which took effect October 29, 1983, concerning those areas defined by the commission.

Acts 1984, ch. 943, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Substituted “commission on aging and disability” for “commission on aging” pursuant to Acts 2001, ch. 397.

4-3-124. Sexual harassment policy — Posting.

Each entity of state government shall post in the workplace the state policy for the prevention of sexual harassment established pursuant to chapter 307 of the Public Acts of 1993.

Acts 1993, ch. 307, § 1.

Cross-References. Department of human resources, prevention of sexual harassment, §4-3-1703.

Office of legislative administration, prevention of sexual harassment, §3-13-101.

State human rights commission, policy on prevention of sexual harassment, §4-21-202.

State university and community college system, prevention of sexual harassment, §49-7-122.

Supreme court, sexual harassment prevention policy for inferior courts, §16-3-502.

Law Reviews.

What Part of “No” Don't You Understand?: Recent Developments in Workplace Sexual Harassment Law (William D. Evans Jr.), 36 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2000).